test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-wîcihîw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - wîcihîw :

      # Core 

      # Prs+Ind
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kiwîcihitin
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: niwîcihâw
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kiwîcihin
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kiwîcihâw
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: wîcihîw
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [wîcihikow, wîcihik]

      # Prs+Cnj
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: î-wîcihitân
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: î-wîcihak
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-wîcihiyan
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: î-wîcihat
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-wîcihât
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: î-wîcihikot

      # Imp
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO: wîcihin
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: wîcih
      

      # Prs # Ind

      # 1Sg
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kiwîcihitin
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: niwîcihâw
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO: kiwîcihitinâwâw
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO: niwîcihâwak
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: niwîcihimâwa
      # wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+XO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+XO

      # 2Sg
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kiwîcihin
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kiwîcihâw
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kiwîcihinân
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kiwîcihâwak
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kiwîcihimâwa
      # wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+XO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+XO

      # 3Sg
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kiwîcihin
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2SgO: kiwîcihik
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kiwîcihinân
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+12PlO: kiwîcihikonaw
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2PlO: kiwîcihikowâw
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kiwîcihâwak
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kiwîcihimâwa
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: wîcihimîw
      # wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+XO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+XO

      # 1Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO: kiwîcihitinân
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: niwîcihânân
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO: kiwîcihitinân
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: niwîcihânânak
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: niwîcihimânâna
      # wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+XO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+XO

      # 12Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3SgO: kiwîcihânaw
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3PlO: kiwîcihânawak
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: kiwîcihimânawa
      # wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+XO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+XO

      # 2Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO: kiwîcihinâwâw
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO: kiwîcihâwâw
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: kiwîcihinân
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: kiwîcihâwâwak
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: kiwîcihimâwâwa
      # wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+XO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+XO

      # 3Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1SgO: niwîcihikwak
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2SgO: kiwîcihikwak
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1PlO: niwîcihikonânak
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+12PlO: kiwîcihikonawak
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2PlO: kiwîcihikowâwak
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihîwak
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: wîcihimîwak
      # wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+XO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+XO

      # 4Sg/Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: niwîcihikothiwa
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: kiwîcihikothiwa
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [wîcihikow, wîcihik]
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: niwîcihikonâna
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: kiwîcihikonawa
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: kiwîcihikowâwa
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: [wîcihikowak, wîcihikwak]
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: wîcihîthiwa
      # wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+XO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+XO

      # 5Sg/Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihikothiwa

      # X
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+1SgO: niwîcihikawin
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+2SgO: kiwîcihikawin
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+3SgO: wîcihâw
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+1PlO: niwîcihikawinân
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+12PlO: [kiwîcihikawinaw, kiwîcihikawinânaw]
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+2PlO: kiwîcihikawinâwâw
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+3PlO: wîcihâwak
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+4Sg/PlO: wîcihâthiwa
      

      # Prs # Cnj

      # 1Sg
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: î-wîcihitân
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: î-wîcihak
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO: î-wîcihitakwâw
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO: î-wîcihakwâw
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO: î-wîcihakwâw
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO+Var/East: î-wîcihaki
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-wîcihimak
      # PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+XO: PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+XO

      # 2Sg
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-wîcihiyan
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: î-wîcihat
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: î-wîcihiyâhk
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: î-wîcihacik
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-wîcihimat
      # PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+XO: PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+XO

      # 3Sg
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-wîcihiyan
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: î-wîcihisk
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: î-wîcihiyâhk
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO: î-wîcihikoyâhk
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO+Var/East: î-wîcihiyamiht
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO: î-wîcihikoyahk
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO+Var/East: î-wîcihitahk
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO: î-wîcihikoyîk
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO+Var/East: î-wîcihitîk
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: î-wîcihacik
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-wîcihimat
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: î-wîcihimât
      # PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+XO: PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+XO

      # 1Pl
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO: î-wîcihitâhk
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO: î-wîcihâyâhk
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO+Var/East: î-wîcihâkiht
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO: î-wîcihitâhk
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: î-wîcihâyâhkwâw
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO+Var/East: î-wîcihakihcik
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-wîcihimâyâhk
      # PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+XO: PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+XO

      # 12Pl
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO: î-wîcihâyahk
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO+Var/East: î-wîcihahk
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO: î-wîcihâyahkwâw
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO+Var/East: î-wîcihahkwâw
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-wîcihimâyahk
      # PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+XO: PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+XO

      # 2Pl
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO: î-wîcihiyîk
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3SgO: î-wîcihâyîk
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO: î-wîcihiyâhk
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO: î-wîcihâyîkwâw
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO+Var/East: î-wîcihâyîkok
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-wîcihimâyîk
      # PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+XO: PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+XO

      # 3Pl
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1SgO: [î-wîcihitwâw, î-wîcihicik]
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2SgO: î-wîcihiskwâw
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO: î-wîcihikoyâhkwâw
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO+Var/East: î-wîcihiyamihcik
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO: î-wîcihikoyahkwâw
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO+Var/East: î-wîcihitahkwâw
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO: î-wîcihikoyîkwâw
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO+Var/East: î-wîcihitîkwâw
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-wîcihâcik
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: î-wîcihimâcik
      # PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+XO: PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+XO

      # 4Sg/Pl
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: î-wîcihimit
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: î-wîcihimisk
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: î-wîcihikot
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: î-wîcihikoyâhk
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: î-wîcihikoyahk
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: î-wîcihikoyîk
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: î-wîcihikocik
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: î-wîcihâthit
      # PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+XO: PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+XO

      # 5Sg/Pl
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-wîcihikothit

      # X
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1SgO: î-wîcihikawiyân
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2SgO: î-wîcihikawiyan
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3SgO: î-wîcihiht
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1PlO: î-wîcihikawiyâhk
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+12PlO: î-wîcihikawiyahk
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2PlO: î-wîcihikawiyîk
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3PlO: î-wîcihihcik
      PV/î+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+4Sg/PlO: î-wîcihimiht
      

      # Prt # Ind

      # 1Sg
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kikî-wîcihitin
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: nikî-wîcihâw
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO: kikî-wîcihitinâwâw
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO: nikî-wîcihâwak
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: nikî-wîcihimâwa
      # PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+XO: PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+XO

      # 2Sg
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kikî-wîcihin
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kikî-wîcihâw
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kikî-wîcihinân
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kikî-wîcihâwak
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kikî-wîcihimâwa
      # PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+XO: PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+XO

      # 3Sg
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kikî-wîcihin
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2SgO: kikî-wîcihik
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kikî-wîcihinân
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+12PlO: kikî-wîcihikonaw
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2PlO: kikî-wîcihikowâw
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kikî-wîcihâwak
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kikî-wîcihimâwa
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: kî-wîcihimîw
      # PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+XO: PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+XO

      # 1Pl
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO: kikî-wîcihitinân
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: nikî-wîcihânân
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO: kikî-wîcihitinân
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: nikî-wîcihânânak
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: nikî-wîcihimânâna
      # PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+XO: PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+XO

      # 12Pl
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3SgO: kikî-wîcihânaw
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3PlO: kikî-wîcihânawak
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: kikî-wîcihimânawa
      # PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+XO: PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+XO

      # 2Pl
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO: kikî-wîcihinâwâw
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO: kikî-wîcihâwâw
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: kikî-wîcihinân
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: kikî-wîcihâwâwak
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: kikî-wîcihimâwâwa
      # PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+XO: PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+XO

      # 3Pl
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1SgO: nikî-wîcihikwak
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2SgO: kikî-wîcihikwak
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1PlO: nikî-wîcihikonânak
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+12PlO: kikî-wîcihikonawak
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2PlO: kikî-wîcihikowâwak
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: kî-wîcihîwak
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: kî-wîcihimîwak
      # PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+XO: PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+XO

      # 4Sg/Pl
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: nikî-wîcihikothiwa
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: kikî-wîcihikothiwa
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [kî-wîcihikow, kî-wîcihik]
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: nikî-wîcihikonâna
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: kikî-wîcihikonawa
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: kikî-wîcihikowâwa
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: [kî-wîcihikowak, kî-wîcihikwak]
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: kî-wîcihîthiwa
      # PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+XO: PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+XO

      # 5Sg/Pl
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: kî-wîcihikothiwa
